it: Casa e giardino > Cucina e pranzo > Stoviglie > Shaker per condimenti: Shaker per formaggio; Shaker per pepe; Saliera; Set di shaker
lt-LT: Namai ir sodas > Virtuvė ir valgomasis > Stalo reikmenys > Prieskonių barstytuvai: Sūrio barstytuvai; Pipirinės; Druskinės; Barstytuvų rinkiniai
da: Hjem og have > Køkken og spisestue > Service og bestik > Krydderibøsser: Ostebøsser; Peberbøsser; Saltbøsser; Bøssesæt
hu: Otthon és kert > Konyha és étkező > Asztali edények > Fűszerszórók: Sajtszórók; Borsszórók; Sószórók; Szórókészletek
hr-HR: Dom i vrt > Kuhinja i blagovaonica > Stolni pribor > Posude za umake: Posudice za posipanje sira; Posude za papar; Soljenke; Kompleti soljenki
ko: 가정/원예 용품 > 주방/식탁 > 식탁용 식기류 > 조미료 셰이커: 치즈 셰이커; 후추 셰이커; 소금 셰이커; 셰이커 세트
th: บ้านและสวน > ห้องครัวและการรับประทานอาหาร > เครื่องใช้บนโต๊ะอาหาร > ขวดใส่เครื่องปรุง: ขวดใส่ชีส; ขวดใส่พริกไทย; ขวดใส่เกลือ; ชุดขวดใส่เครื่องปรุง
ja: ホーム・ガーデン > キッチン・ダイニング > テーブルウェア > 調味料シェーカー: チーズシェイカー; こしょうシェーカー; 塩シェイカー; シェーカーセット
en: Home & Garden > Kitchen & Dining > Tableware > Condiment Shakers: Cheese Shakers; Pepper Shakers; Salt Shakers; Shaker Sets
sv: Hem och trädgård > Kök och matsal > Serviser > Kryddströare: Ostströare; Pepparströare; Saltströare; Shakerset
vi: Nhà và vườn > Phòng bếp và phòng ăn > Đồ dùng trên bàn ăn > Lọ gia vị: Lọ phô mai; Lọ tiêu; Lọ muối; Bộ lọ đựng
pt-BR: Casa e jardim > Produtos de cozinha e aparelhos de jantar > Utensílios para mesa > Porta-condimentos: Porta-queijo ralado; Pimenteiros; Saleiros; Conjuntos de saleiro e pimenteiro
ru: Дом и сад > Кухня и сервировка стола > Столовая посуда и предметы сервировки > Солонки, перечницы и баночки для других приправ: Шейкеры для сыра; Перечницы; Солонки; Наборы баночек для приправ
bg-BG: Дом и градина > Кухня и трапезария > Посуда за хранене > Бурканчета за ръсене на подправки: Бурканчета за ръсене на сирене; Пиперници; Солници; Комплекти бурканчета за ръсене
sl-SI: Dom in vrt > Kuhinja in jedilnica > Namizni pribor > Posipalci za začimbe: Posipalci za sir; Poprnice; Solnice; Kompleti posipalcev
sk-SK: Dom a záhrada > Kuchyňa a jedáleň > Stolový riad > Koreničky: Dávkovače na syry; Elektrické koreničky; Soľničky; Súpravy koreničiek
nl: Huis en tuin > Keuken en eetkamer > Servies en bestek > Specerijshakers: Kaasshakers; Pepershakers; Zoutshakers; Shakersets
fr: Maison et jardin > Arts de la table et arts culinaires > Arts de la table > Shaker à condiments: Shaker à fromage; Poivrières; Salières; Ensembles de shakers
cs: Dům a zahrada > Kuchyně a jídelny > Stolní nádobí > Kořenky: Dávkovače sýra; Pepřenky; Solničky; Menážky
el: Σπίτι & κήπος > Κουζίνα & τραπεζαρία > Επιτραπέζια σκεύη σερβιρίσματος > Δοχεία μπαχαρικών: Δοχεία τυριού; Δοχεία πιπεριού; Δοχεία αλατιού; Σετ δοχείων
pt-PT: Casa e jardim > Cozinha e refeições > Louça de mesa > Frascos para especiarias: Dispensadores de queijo ralado; Pimenteiros; Saleiros; Conjuntos de frascos para especiarias
tr: Ev ve Bahçe > Mutfak ve Yemek > Sofra Takımları > Tuzluk ve Biberlikler: Peynirlikler; Biberlikler; Tuzluklar; Baharat Setleri
nb: Hjem og hage > Kjøkken og spiserom > Borddekning > Tilbehørsbøsser: Ostebøsser; Pepperbøsser; Saltbøsser; Bøssesett
pl: Dom i ogród > Kuchnia i jadalnia > Zastawy stołowe > Dozowniki do przypraw: Dozowniki do sera; Pieprzniczki; Solniczki; Zestawy dozowników
de: Heim & Garten > Küche & Esszimmer > Tafelgeschirr > Gewürzstreuer: Käsestreuer; Pfefferstreuer; Salzstreuer; Shaker-Sets
zh-CN: 家居与园艺 > 厨房/餐厅 > 餐具 > 调料瓶: 奶酪瓶; 胡椒瓶; 盐瓶; 调料瓶套装
fi: Koti ja puutarha > Keittiö ja ruokailu > Astiat > Maustesirottimet: Juustosirottimet; Pippurisirottimet; Suolasirottimet; Sirotinsarjat
ro-RO: Casă și grădină > Bucătărie și sufragerie > Veselă > Recipiente pentru condimente: Recipiente pentru brânză; Recipiente pentru piper; Solnițe; Seturi cu recipiente pentru condimente
zh-TW: 居家和庭園 > 廚房與餐廳 > 餐具 > 調味調理罐: 起司罐; 胡椒罐; 鹽罐; 調理罐組
es: Casa y jardín > Cocina y comedor > Utensilios de mesa > Recipientes para condimentos: Queseras; Pimenteros; Saleros; Juegos de coctelera